ja: 工芸品装飾メーカータイプ: チョークマーカー; グリッターアプリケーター; スタンパー; ステッカーメーカー; その他
nl: Type ambachtelijke decoratiemaker: Schoolbordkrijt; Glitter-applicator; Stamper; Stickermaker; Andere
nb: Hobbydekorasjonsmakertype: Krittmarkør; Glitterapplikator; Stamper; Klistremerkemaker; Annet
cs: Typ nástroje na dekorace: Křídový popisovač; Aplikátor třpytek; Razítko; Zařízení pro výrobu samolepek; Jiné
zh-CN: 手工艺装饰制作机类型: 粉笔制作机; 闪粉涂抹器; 压模; 贴纸制作机; 其他
vi: Loại dụng cụ trang trí thủ công: Bút đánh dấu bằng phấn; Cọ tán nhũ; Máy đóng dấu; Máy in nhãn dán; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta alata za izradu ukrasa: Marker-kreda; Aplikator šljokica; Stamper; Izrađivač naljepnica; Ostalo
sv: Typ av hobbydekorationsverktyg: Kritmarkör; Glitterapplikator; Stämpel; Dekaltillverkare; Övrigt
th: ประเภทเครื่องตกแต่งงานฝีมือ: ชอล์กตกแต่ง; ที่ป้ายกลิตเตอร์; ตรายาง; เครื่องทำสติกเกอร์; อื่นๆ
tr: El işi dekorasyon üreticisi tipi: Tebeşir kalemi; Sim aplikatörü; Damgalayıcı; Çıkartma makinesi; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip de dispozitiv pentru decorațiuni artizanale: Marker cu cretă; Aplicator de sclipici; Matriță de presat; Marker pentru autocolante; Altele
en: Craft decoration maker type: Chalk marker; Glitter applicator; Stamper; Sticker maker; Other
hu: Kézműves dekorációkészítő típusa: Jelölő kréta; Csillámpor-applikátor; Bélyegző; Matricakészítő; Egyéb
ru: Тип устройства для изготовления декоративных элементов: Меловой маркер; Аппликатор для блесток; Штамп; Изготовитель наклеек; Другое
fr: Type de machine à fabriquer des décorations pour loisirs créatifs: Marqueur à craie; Applicateur de paillettes; Tampon; Machine à autocollants; Autre
da: Type af apparat til bearbejdning af dekorationsmaterialer: Kridtmarkør; Glitterapplikator; Stempelhammer; Mærkatmager; Andet
es: Tipo de herramientas de decoración: Marcador de tiza; Aplicador de purpurina; Estampador; Creador de pegatinas; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de criador de decoração artesanal: Marcador de giz; Aplicador de purpurina; Carimbo; Criador de autocolantes; Outro
fi: Käsityökoristeiden työkalutyyppi: Liitukynät; Kimallelevittimet; Leimasin; Tarrakone; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta orodja za izdelavo okraskov: Kreda za označevanje; Aplikator z bleščicami; Štampiljka; Izdelovalec nalepk; Drugo
it: Tipo di creatore di decorazioni artigianali: Pennarello a gesso; Applicatore glitterato; Timbratore; Produttore di adesivi; Altro
pl: Rodzaj narzędzia do tworzenia ozdób: Marker kredowy; Aplikator brokatu; Stempel; Zestaw do tworzenia naklejek; Inne
sk-SK: Typ výrobcu kreatívnych dekorácií: Kriedová fixka; Glitrový aplikátor; Pečiatkovač; Výrobca nálepiek; Iné
ko: 공예 장식 제작 도구 타입: 분필 마커; 글리터 어플리케이터; 스탬퍼; 스티커 메이커; 기타
el: Τύπος κατασκευαστή διακόσμησης χειροτεχνίας: Μαρκαδόρος κιμωλίας; Απλικατέρ γκλίτερ; Σφραγίδα; Μηχανή κατασκευής αυτοκόλλητων; Άλλο
zh-TW: 手工裝飾用具類型: 水粉筆; 亮粉棒; 壓模; 貼紙機; 其他
lt-LT: Dekoracijų gaminimo priemonės tipas: Kreidos žymeklis; Blizgučių aplikatorius; Spaudas; Lipdukų aparatas; Kita
de: Typen von Dekorationswerkzeugen für Kunstarbeiten: Kreidemarker; Glitzerapplikator; Stempel; Aufkleber-Hersteller; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип уреди за направа на декоративни елементи: Тебеширен маркер; Апликатор за блясък; Щампер; Създател на стикери; Други
pt-BR: Tipo de criador de decoração artesanal: Marcador de giz; Aplicador de brilho; Carimbo; Criador de adesivos; Outro